Maryland, session 2025, SB0724.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Tax – Property
14–811.
(a) (1) Except as provided in this section, the collector may withhold from sale
any property, when the total taxes on the property, including interest and penalties,
amount to less than $250 in any 1 year.
(2) (I) The governing body of a county or municipal corporation may
withhold from sale owner–occupied residential property that meets objective criteria
established by the governing body of the county or municipal corporation.
(II) IN BALTIMORE CITY, THE COLLECTOR MAY WITHHOLD
FROM SALE RESIDENTIAL PROPERTY OCCUPIED BY AN HEIR OF A DECEASED OWNER
IF THE PROPERTY MEETS OBJECTIVE CRITERIA ESTABLISHED BY THE MAYOR AND
CITY COUNCIL OF BALTIMORE CITY.
(b) (1) The collector may withhold from sale any residential property, when
the total taxes on the property, including interest and penalties, amount to less than $750.
(2) In Baltimore City, [the collector shall withhold from sale
owner–occupied residential property,] when the total taxes on the property, including
interest and penalties, amount to less than $750, THE COLLECTOR SHALL WITHHOLD
FROM SALE:
(I) OWNER–OCCUPIED RESIDENTIAL PROPERTY; AND
(II) RESIDENTIAL PROPERTY OCCUPIED BY AN HEIR OF A
DECEASED OWNER.
(3) In Baltimore City, the collector shall withhold from sale residential
property or property that is exempt from taxation under § 7–204(1) or (2) of this article, if
the taxes on the property consist only of a lien for unpaid charges for water and sewer
services.
(h) (1) In this subsection, “dwelling” and “homeowner” have the meanings
stated in § 9–105 of this article.
(2) (I) The governing body of a county or municipal corporation may
withhold from sale a dwelling owned by a homeowner who is low–income, at least 65 years
old, or disabled if the homeowner meets eligibility criteria established by the county or
municipal corporation.

SENATE BILL 724 3
(II) IN BALTIMORE CITY, THE COLLECTOR MAY WITHHOLD
FROM SALE A DWELLING, OWNED BY A HOMEOWNER OR OCCUPIED BY AN HEIR OF A
DECEASED HOMEOWNER, WHO IS LOW–INCOME, AT LEAST 65 YEARS OLD, OR
DISABLED IF THE HOMEOWNER OR HEIR MEETS ELIGIBILITY CRITERIA
ESTABLISHED BY THE MAYOR AND CITY COUNCIL OF BALTIMORE CITY.
(J) (1) BALTIMORE CITY SHALL ESTABLISH A REGISTRY FOR
INTERESTED PARTIES TO DESIGNATE A PROPERTY TO BE WITHHELD FROM TAX SALE
IN ACCORDANCE WITH THIS SECTION.
(2) ON REQUEST OF THE MAYOR AND CITY COUNCIL OF BALTIMORE
CITY, THE DEPARTMENT SHALL ASSIST BALTIMORE CITY IN CREATING AND
MAINTAINING THE REGISTRY REQUIRED UNDER PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS
SUBSECTION.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.